Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 618. UNIFORM FACSIMILE SIGNATURE OF PUBLIC OFFICIALS ACT

Sec. 618.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Facsimile Signature of Public Officials Act.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 618.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Authorized officer" means any official of this state, a political subdivision of this state, or a department, agency, or instrumentality of this state or of a political subdivision of this state whose signature is required or permitted to be placed on a public security, eligible contract, instrument of payment, or certificate of assessment.

(2) "Certificate of assessment" means a certificate or instrument evidencing a special assessment that is issued by an agency or political subdivision of this state.

(3) "Eligible contract" means a written evidence of agreement, including a contract, purchase order, and surety bond, and any related document, including an application, certificate, and approval, other than a public security or instrument of payment, that is executed, authenticated, certified, or endorsed for or on behalf of a home-rule municipality with a population of 200,000 or more.

(4) "Facsimile signature" means a reproduction of the manual signature of an authorized officer that is made by any method, including engraving, imprinting, lithographing, and stamping.

(5) "Instrument of payment" means a check, draft, warrant, or order for the payment, delivery, or transfer of money.

(6) "Public security" means an obligation for the payment of money, including a bond, note, and certificate of indebtedness, that is issued by this state, a political subdivision of this state, or a department, agency, or instrumentality of this state or of a political subdivision of this state.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1226 (S.B. 577), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 618.003. AUTHORITY FOR FACSIMILE SIGNATURE. (a) An authorized officer may execute, authenticate, certify, or endorse or authorize to be executed, authenticated, certified, or endorsed with the officer's facsimile signature instead of the officer's manual signature:

(1) a public security, instrument of payment, or certificate of assessment, if the use of the facsimile signature is authorized by the board, body, or officer empowered to authorize the issuance of the security, instrument, or certificate; or

(2) an eligible contract, if the use of the facsimile signature is authorized by the governing body of the municipality.

(b) A facsimile signature of the comptroller, or of a deputy designated in writing to act for the comptroller, may be placed on a public security required to be registered by the comptroller or a certificate on that security.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 181 (H.B. 1748), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 618.005. EFFECT OF FACSIMILE SIGNATURE. A facsimile signature placed in compliance with this chapter has the same legal effect as the authorized officer's manual signature.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 618.006. LACK OF AUTHORITY NOT DEFENSE. In a suit or other legal action against an authorized officer whose facsimile signature is placed under this chapter on a public security, instrument of payment, certificate of assessment, or eligible contract, the placement of the facsimile signature without the officer's authority or consent is not a defense.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 618.007. AUTHORITY FOR FACSIMILE SEAL. If the seal of this state, a political subdivision of this state, or a department, agency, or instrumentality of this state or of a political subdivision of this state is required in the execution, authentication, certification, or endorsement of a public security, instrument of payment, certificate of assessment, or eligible contract, an appropriate authorized officer may authorize the printing, engraving, lithographing, stamping, or other placement of a facsimile of the seal on the document.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 618.008. EFFECT OF FACSIMILE SEAL. A facsimile seal placed in compliance with this chapter has the same legal effect as an impression of the seal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 618.009. FRAUDULENT PLACEMENT OF FACSIMILE SIGNATURE OR SEAL; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if, with intent to defraud, the person places on a public security, instrument of payment, certificate of assessment or eligible contract:

(1) a facsimile signature or a reproduction of a facsimile signature; or

(2) a facsimile seal, or a reproduction of a facsimile seal, of this state, a political subdivision of this state, or a department, agency, or instrumentality of this state or a political subdivision of this state.

(b) An offense under this section is a felony punishable by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for any term of not more than seven years or less than two years.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.078, eff. September 1, 2009.